District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.47

Definition of terms set forth in acts and resolutions.

For the purposes of any act or resolution of the Council of the District of Columbia, unless specifically provided otherwise:

(1)

The term “Council” means the Council of the District of Columbia established under § 1-204.01.

(2)

The term “Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia established under § 1-204.21.

(3)

The term “Act” means an Act of the Congress.

(4)

The term “act” means an act of the Council.

(5)

The term “District” means the District of Columbia.

Sept. 23, 1975, D.C. Law 1-17, § 4, 22 DCR 1992
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 105, 51 DCR 881
1981 Ed., § 1-232.
1973 Ed., § 1-146c.
D.C. Law 15-105 added par. (5).